test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_II_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: g̲íihlgii'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waa'ahl
     g̲íihlgii+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: g̲íihlgii'ang'waaäseehl
